Missouri, session 2026, SB878.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 195.417, 338.010, 338.012, and
579.060, RSMo, are repealed and ten new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 195.417, 338.010, 338.012,
338.206, 338.208, 338.312, 376.417, 376.1280, 376.1960, and
579.060, to read as follows:
195.417. 1. The limits specified in this section
shall not apply to any quantity of such product, mixture, or
preparation which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in
a pharmacy pursuant to a valid prescription.
2. Within any thirty-day period, no person shall sell,
dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual, and
no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more
than the following amount: any number of packages of any
drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
either as:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

HCS SS SCS SB 878 2
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions.
3. Within any twenty-four-hour period, no pharmacist,
intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician shall
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams
without regard to the number of transactions.
4. Within any twelve-month period, no person shall
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any

HCS SS SCS SB 878 3
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection;
in any total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and
two-tenths grams, without regard to the number of
transactions.
5. All packages of any compound, mixture, or
preparation containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
except those that are excluded from Schedule V in subsection
17 or 18 of section 195.017, shall be offered for sale only
from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not
permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
pharmacy technician under section 195.017.
6. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding
sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified
in this section in accordance with transmission methods and
frequency established by the department by regulation.
7. (1) As used in this subsection, "administrator of
the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine tracking system"
means the entity responsible for developing, implementing,
and maintaining the data collection system described in 19
CSR 30-1.074 or any successor regulation.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter, any manufacturer of any compound, mixture, or
preparation specified in this section that is sold in or

HCS SS SCS SB 878 4
into the state shall, on a monthly basis, pay fees to the
administrator of the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine
tracking system.
(3) The administrator of the real-time electronic
pseudoephedrine tracking system shall be responsible for
setting the fee levels required under this subsection.
(4) Upon the request of the department of health and
senior services, any manufacturer required to pay fees under
this subsection shall provide written documentation
demonstrating that the manufacturer has paid such fees.
(5) The fees required under this subsection shall be
assessed against each manufacturer solely on the basis of
sales transactions involving that manufacturer's own
compounds, mixtures, or preparations sold in or into the
state. No manufacturer shall be assessed fees based upon
transactions attributable to the compounds, mixtures, or
preparations of any other manufacturer.
8. No prescription shall be required for the
dispensation, sale, or distribution of any drug product
containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in an
amount within the limits described in subsections 2, 3, and
4 of this section. The superintendent of the Missouri state
highway patrol shall report to the revisor of statutes and
the general assembly by February first when the statewide
number of methamphetamine laboratory seizure incidents
100 exceeds three hundred incidents in the previous calendar
101 year. The provisions of this subsection shall expire on
102 April first of the calendar year in which the revisor of
103 statutes receives such notification.

HCS SS SCS SB 878 5
104 [8.] 9. This section shall supersede and preempt any
105 local ordinances or regulations, including any ordinances or
106 regulations enacted by any political subdivision of the
107 state. This section shall not apply to the sale of any
108 animal feed products containing ephedrine or any naturally
109 occurring or herbal ephedra or extract of ephedra.
110 [9.] 10. Any local ordinances or regulations enacted
111 by any political subdivision of the state prior to August
112 28, 2020, requiring a prescription for the dispensation,
113 sale, or distribution of any drug product containing any
114 detectable amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
115 pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers,
116 or salts of optical isomers, in an amount within the limits
117 described in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section shall
118 be void and of no effect and no such political subdivision
119 shall maintain or enforce such ordinance or regulation.
120 [10.] 11. All logs, records, documents, and electronic
121 information maintained for the dispensing of these products
122 shall be open for inspection and copying by municipal,
123 county, and state or federal law enforcement officers whose
124 duty it is to enforce the controlled substances laws of this
125 state or the United States.
126 [11.] 12. All persons who dispense or offer for sale
127 pseudoephedrine and ephedrine products, except those that
128 are excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of
129 section 195.017, shall ensure that all such products are
130 located only behind a pharmacy counter where the public is
131 not permitted.
132 [12.] 13. The penalty for a knowing or reckless
133 violation of this section is found in section 579.060.
338.010. 1. The "practice of pharmacy" includes:

HCS SS SCS SB 878 6
(1) The interpretation, implementation, and evaluation
of medical prescription orders, including any legend drugs
under 21 U.S.C. Section 353, and the receipt, transmission,
or handling of such orders or facilitating the dispensing of
such orders;
(2) The designing, initiating, implementing, and
monitoring of a medication therapeutic plan in accordance
with the provisions of this section;
(3) The compounding, dispensing, labeling, and
administration of drugs and devices pursuant to medical
prescription orders;
(4) The ordering and administration of vaccines
approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration, as of January 1, 2026, or thereafter,
excluding vaccines for cholera, monkeypox, Japanese
encephalitis, typhoid, rabies, yellow fever, tick-borne
encephalitis, anthrax, tuberculosis, dengue, Hib, polio,
rotavirus, smallpox, [and any vaccine approved after January
1, 2023] or any vaccine that is not jointly included by
joint rules promulgated by the board of pharmacy and the
state board of registration for the healing arts for
vaccines approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration
after January 1, 2026, to persons at least seven years of
age or the age recommended by the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention, whichever is older, pursuant to
joint promulgation of rules established by the board of
pharmacy and the state board of registration for the healing
arts unless rules are established under a state of emergency
as described in section 44.100;
(5) The participation in drug selection according to
state law and participation in drug utilization reviews;

HCS SS SCS SB 878 7
(6) The proper and safe storage of drugs and devices
and the maintenance of proper records thereof;
(7) Consultation with patients and other health care
practitioners, and veterinarians and their clients about
legend drugs, about the safe and effective use of drugs and
devices;
(8) The prescribing and dispensing of any nicotine
replacement therapy product under section 338.665;
(9) The dispensing of HIV postexposure prophylaxis
pursuant to section 338.730; and
(10) The offering or performing of those acts,
services, operations, or transactions necessary in the
conduct, operation, management and control of a pharmacy.
2. No person shall engage in the practice of pharmacy
unless he or she is licensed under the provisions of this
chapter.
3. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit the
use of auxiliary personnel under the direct supervision of a
pharmacist from assisting the pharmacist in any of his or
her duties. This assistance in no way is intended to
relieve the pharmacist from his or her responsibilities for
compliance with this chapter and he or she will be
responsible for the actions of the auxiliary personnel
acting in his or her assistance.
4. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit or
interfere with any legally registered practitioner of
medicine, dentistry, or podiatry, or veterinary medicine
only for use in animals, or the practice of optometry in
accordance with and as provided in sections 195.070 and
336.220 in the compounding, administering, prescribing, or
dispensing of his or her own prescriptions.

HCS SS SCS SB 878 8
5. A pharmacist with a certificate of medication
therapeutic plan authority may provide medication therapy
services pursuant to a written protocol from a physician
licensed under chapter 334 to patients who have established
a physician-patient relationship, as described in
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 191.1146, with
the protocol physician. The written protocol authorized by
this section shall come only from the physician and shall
not come from a nurse engaged in a collaborative practice
arrangement under section 334.104, or from a physician
assistant engaged in a collaborative practice arrangement
under section 334.735.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to
prevent any person, firm or corporation from owning a
pharmacy regulated by sections 338.210 to 338.315, provided
that a licensed pharmacist is in charge of such pharmacy.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply
to or interfere with the sale of nonprescription drugs and
the ordinary household remedies and such drugs or medicines
as are normally sold by those engaged in the sale of general
merchandise.
8. No health carrier as defined in chapter 376 shall
require any physician with which they contract to enter into
a written protocol with a pharmacist for medication
therapeutic services.
9. This section shall not be construed to allow a
pharmacist to diagnose or independently prescribe
pharmaceuticals.
10. The state board of registration for the healing
arts, under section 334.125, and the state board of
pharmacy, under section 338.140, shall jointly promulgate
rules regulating the use of protocols for medication therapy

HCS SS SCS SB 878 9
services. Such rules shall require protocols to include
provisions allowing for timely communication between the
pharmacist and the protocol physician or similar body
authorized by this section, and any other patient protection
100 provisions deemed appropriate by both boards. In order to
101 take effect, such rules shall be approved by a majority vote
102 of a quorum of each board. Neither board shall separately
103 promulgate rules regulating the use of protocols for
104 medication therapy services. Any rule or portion of a rule,
105 as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
106 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
107 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
108 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
109 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
110 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
111 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
112 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
113 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
114 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
115 2007, shall be invalid and void.
116 11. The state board of pharmacy may grant a
117 certificate of medication therapeutic plan authority to a
118 licensed pharmacist who submits proof of successful
119 completion of a board-approved course of academic clinical
120 study beyond a bachelor of science in pharmacy, including
121 but not limited to clinical assessment skills, from a
122 nationally accredited college or university, or a
123 certification of equivalence issued by a nationally
124 recognized professional organization and approved by the
125 board of pharmacy.
126 12. Any pharmacist who has received a certificate of
127 medication therapeutic plan authority may engage in the

HCS SS SCS SB 878 10
128 designing, initiating, implementing, and monitoring of a
129 medication therapeutic plan as defined by a written protocol
130 from a physician that may be specific to each patient for
131 care by a pharmacist.
132 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
133 allow a pharmacist to make a therapeutic substitution of a
134 pharmaceutical prescribed by a physician unless authorized
135 by the written protocol or the physician's prescription
136 order.
137 14. "Veterinarian", "doctor of veterinary medicine",
138 "practitioner of veterinary medicine", "DVM", "VMD", "BVSe",
139 "BVMS", "BSe (Vet Science)", "VMB", "MRCVS", or an
140 equivalent title means a person who has received a doctor's
141 degree in veterinary medicine from an accredited school of
142 veterinary medicine or holds an Educational Commission for
143 Foreign Veterinary Graduates (EDFVG) certificate issued by
144 the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA).
145 15. In addition to other requirements established by
146 the joint promulgation of rules by the board of pharmacy and
147 the state board of registration for the healing arts:
148 (1) A pharmacist shall administer vaccines by protocol
149 in accordance with treatment guidelines established by the
150 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC);
151 (2) A pharmacist who is administering a vaccine shall
152 request a patient to remain in the pharmacy a safe amount of
153 time after administering the vaccine to observe any adverse
154 reactions. Such pharmacist shall have adopted emergency
155 treatment protocols.
156 16. In addition to other requirements by the board, a
157 pharmacist shall receive additional training as required by
158 the board and evidenced by receiving a certificate from the

HCS SS SCS SB 878 11
159 board upon completion, and shall display the certification
160 in his or her pharmacy where vaccines are delivered.
161 17. A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the
162 administration of a vaccine will be entered into the
163 ShowMeVax system, as administered by the department of
164 health and senior services. The patient shall attest to the
165 inclusion of such information in the system by signing a
166 form provided by the pharmacist. If the patient indicates
167 that he or she does not want such information entered into
168 the ShowMeVax system, the pharmacist shall provide a written
169 report within fourteen days of administration of a vaccine
170 to the patient's health care provider, if provided by the
171 patient, containing:
172 (1) The identity of the patient;
173 (2) The identity of the vaccine or vaccines
174 administered;
175 (3) The route of administration;
176 (4) The anatomic site of the administration;
177 (5) The dose administered; and
178 (6) The date of administration.
179 18. A pharmacist licensed under this chapter may order
180 and administer vaccines approved or authorized by the U.S.
181 Food and Drug Administration to address a public health
182 need, as lawfully authorized by the state or federal
183 government, or a department or agency thereof, during a
184 state or federally declared public health emergency.
338.012. 1. A pharmacist with a certificate of
medication therapeutic plan authority may provide influenza,
group A streptococcus, and COVID-19 medication therapy
services pursuant to [a statewide standing order issued by
the director or chief medical officer of the department of
health and senior services if that person is a licensed

HCS SS SCS SB 878 12
physician, or a licensed physician designated by the
department of health and senior services] rules established
by the board of pharmacy and the state board of registration
for the healing arts, as described in this section.
2. This section shall not be construed to allow a
pharmacist to diagnose or independently prescribe
pharmaceuticals.
3. The state board of registration for the healing
arts, pursuant to section 334.125, and the state board of
pharmacy, pursuant to section 338.140, shall jointly
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2023, shall be invalid and void.
338.206. 1. As used in this section, the term
"medical device" shall mean equipment that is furnished by a
supplier or a home health agency and meets the following
conditions:
(1) Is a device classified by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration as a Class I or Class II device under 21
U.S.C. Section 360c and its implementing regulations under
21 CFR Parts 860 to 892;

HCS SS SCS SB 878 13
(2) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a
medical purpose;
(3) Generally is not useful to an individual in the
absence of an illness or injury; and
(4) Is appropriate for use in the home.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to
the contrary, pharmacists may prescribe any medical devices
authorized by rule promulgated jointly by the state board of
registration for the healing arts and the board of pharmacy
in accordance with subsection 3 of this section.
3. The state board of registration for the healing
arts, pursuant to section 334.125, and the board of
pharmacy, pursuant to section 338.140, shall jointly
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Such rules shall be written and effective within
six months of the effective date of this section.
4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
338.208. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, a pharmacist may dispense ivermectin and
hydroxychloroquine to a person, without requiring a
prescription order from a licensed health care practitioner,

HCS SS SCS SB 878 14
upon the approval of a warning label for the use and
indication in accordance with any written, standardized
procedures or protocols for the pharmacist issued by the
board of pharmacy, including, if required, providing the
person with instructions on the proper use of ivermectin and
hydroxychloroquine. Any ivermectin or hydroxychloroquine
that is dispensed by a pharmacist without a prescription
shall be kept behind the counter or otherwise not available
for self-service or direct consumer access, be stored in a
secure area accessible only to pharmacy personnel, and be
dispensed only by a pharmacist or pharmacy technician under
a pharmacist's supervision.
338.312. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context requires otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Declared state disaster or emergency", a disaster
or emergency event for which a governor's state of emergency
proclamation has been issued or that the President of the
United States has declared to be a major disaster or
emergency;
(2) "Disaster period", the period of time that begins
ten days before a governor's proclamation of a state of
emergency or the declaration by the President of the United
States of a major disaster or emergency, whichever occurs
first, and extending for a period of sixty calendar days
following the end of the period specified in the
proclamation or declaration or sixty calendar days from the
proclamation or declaration if no end is provided. The
governor may extend the disaster period as warranted;
(3) "Pharmacy", the same meaning given to the term in
section 338.210.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to contrary,
the board of pharmacy shall have the authority to waive

HCS SS SCS SB 878 15
compliance with any Missouri rules and regulations for a
licensed pharmacy that is domiciled or headquartered in this
state when such pharmacy is dispensing, shipping, or
delivering prescription drugs into another state or United
States territory that is experiencing a declared state
disaster or emergency, provided that:
(1) The pharmacy is a licensed pharmacy in good
standing under this chapter and is authorized to ship
prescription drugs into the state or territory in question;
(2) The pharmacy is responding to an active declared
state disaster or emergency;
(3) The pharmacy complies with all emergency rules and
regulations for pharmacies established by the state or
territory for the duration of the disaster period;
(4) The pharmacy complies with all applicable federal
laws and regulations; and
(5) The waiver applies only to prescription drugs
dispensed, shipped, or delivered to residents or health care
facilities located within the geographic area specified in
the declared state disaster or emergency.
3. The board of pharmacy may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

HCS SS SCS SB 878 16
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
376.417. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "340B drug", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.414;
(2) "Covered entity", any entity described in
subparagraphs (A) to (K) of subsection (a)(4) of Section
340B of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section
256b, including any pharmacy with which such entity has
contracted to dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the entity;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy", an entity licensed under chapter 338;
(5) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388.
2. A health carrier, a pharmacy benefits manager, or
an agent or affiliate of such health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager shall not discriminate against a covered
entity including, but not limited to, by doing any of the
following:
(1) Reimbursing a covered entity for a quantity of a
340B drug in an amount less than it would pay any other
similarly situated pharmacy or entity that is not a covered
entity for such quantity of such drug on the basis that the
covered entity is a covered entity or that the covered
entity dispenses 340B drugs. The director of the department
of commerce and insurance shall specify by rule the
circumstances under which a pharmacy or entity shall be
deemed a "similarly situated pharmacy or entity" for
purposes of this subdivision;

HCS SS SCS SB 878 17
(2) Imposing any terms or conditions on covered
entities that differ from such terms or conditions applied
to other similarly situated entities or pharmacies that are
not covered entities on the basis that the covered entity is
a covered entity or that the covered entity dispenses 340B
drugs including, but not limited to, terms or conditions
with respect to any of the following:
(a) Fees, chargebacks, clawbacks, adjustments, or
other assessments;
(b) Professional dispensing fees;
(c) Restrictions or requirements regarding
participation in standard or preferred pharmacy networks;
(d) Requirements relating to the frequency or scope of
audits or to inventory management systems using generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(e) Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or
policies that, as specified by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, interfere with the
ability of a covered entity to maximize the value of
discounts provided under 42 U.S.C. Section 256b;
(3) Discriminating in reimbursement to a covered
entity based on the determination or indication a drug is a
340B drug;
(4) Requiring a covered entity to identify, either
directly or through a third party, a 340B drug;
(5) Refusing to cover drugs purchased under the 340B
drug-pricing program; or
(6) Requiring a covered entity to reverse, resubmit,
or clarify a 340B drug-pricing claim after the initial
adjudication unless these actions are:
(a) In the normal course of pharmacy business and not
related to 340B drug pricing; or

HCS SS SCS SB 878 18
(b) Required by federal law.
3. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall impose a civil penalty on any health
carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, or agent or affiliate of
such health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager that
violates the requirements of this section. Such penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day.
4. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
376.1280. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Acute pain", pain that results from disease,
accidental or intentional trauma, or other causes, that a
health care provider reasonably expects to last thirty days
or fewer;
(2) "Chronic pain", pain that is a persistent and long-
lasting condition characterized by discomfort or pain that
lasts for more than twelve weeks, often persisting beyond
the expected healing time. It may result from various

HCS SS SCS SB 878 19
causes including, but not limited to, injury, surgery, nerve
damage, or underlying medical conditions;
(3) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(5) "Health care professional", the same meaning given
to the term in section 376.1350.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, when a licensed health care professional acting
within the scope of his or her license prescribes a
nonopioid medication for the treatment of acute or chronic
pain to an enrollee, it shall be unlawful for a health
benefit plan to:
(1) Deny coverage of the nonopioid prescription drug
in favor of an opioid prescription drug;
(2) Require the enrollee to try an opioid prescription
drug before providing coverage of the nonopioid prescription
drug; or
(3) Require a higher level of cost-sharing for the
nonopioid prescription drug than for an opioid prescription
drug.
3. This section shall apply to health benefit plans
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed on or
after January 1, 2027.
4. The provisions of this section related to the
treatment of acute pain shall be applicable only when
multiple nonopioid medications are approved by the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration and indicated for the treatment of
acute pain.
5. The provisions of this section related to the
treatment of chronic pain shall be applicable only when

HCS SS SCS SB 878 20
multiple nonopioid medications are approved by the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration and indicated for the treatment of
chronic pain.
376.1960. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as "Nora's Law".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(2) "Home blood pressure monitoring device", a mobile
device that can be used to measure blood pressure, and that
is validated for clinical accuracy and device calibration;
(3) "Home blood pressure monitoring device services",
patient education and training services on the setup and use
of a home blood pressure monitoring device.
3. Health benefit plans delivered, issued for
delivery, continued or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, and providing for maternity benefits, shall
provide coverage for a prescribed home blood pressure
monitoring device and home blood pressure monitoring device
services for pregnant women or women within twelve months
postpartum when determined to be medically appropriate in
accordance with American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists guidelines. Home blood pressure monitoring
devices or home blood pressure monitoring device services
prescribed shall meet the requirements for medical necessity
only and can only be prescribed again if the condition being
monitored deteriorates as to necessitate another
prescription, or as necessary for subsequent pregnancies.
579.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:

HCS SS SCS SB 878 21
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams to the
same individual within a thirty-day period, unless the
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(2) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a thirty-day period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(3) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a twenty-four-hour period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams,
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a

HCS SS SCS SB 878 22
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
tenths grams to the same individual within a twelve-month
period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(5) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
a twelve-month period any number of packages of any drug
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
tenths grams, without regard to the number of transactions,
unless the amount is purchased, received, or acquired
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(6) Dispenses or offers drug products that are not
excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of section
195.017 and that contain detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, without
ensuring that such products are located behind a pharmacy
counter where the public is not permitted and that such
products are dispensed by a registered pharmacist or
pharmacy technician under subsection 11 of section 195.017;
or
(7) Holds a retail sales license issued under chapter
144 and knowingly sells or dispenses packages that do not
conform to the packaging requirements of section 195.418.
2. A pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered
pharmacy technician commits the offense of unlawful sale,
distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
provides any number of packages of any drug product

HCS SS SCS SB 878 23
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenth grams to the
same individual within a twenty-four hour period, unless the
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(2) Fails to submit information under subsection 13 of
section 195.017 and subsection 6 of section 195.417 about
the sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation of
products containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in
accordance with transmission methods and frequency
established by the department of health and senior services;
or
(3) Fails to implement and maintain an electronic log,
as required by subsection 12 of section 195.017, of each
transaction involving any detectable quantity of
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
isomers or ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, or salts
of optical isomers; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses or otherwise
provides to an individual under eighteen years of age
without a valid prescription any number of packages of any
drug product containing any detectable quantity of
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or
salts of optical isomers.
3. Any person who violates the packaging requirements
of section 195.418 and is considered the general owner or
operator of the outlet where ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or

HCS SS SCS SB 878 24
100 phenylpropanolamine products are available for sale shall
101 not be penalized if he or she documents that an employee
102 training program was in place to provide the employee who
103 made the unlawful retail sale with information on the state
104 and federal regulations regarding ephedrine,
105 pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine.
106 4. A manufacturer commits the offense of unlawful
107 sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
108 methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly fails
109 to pay the fees required under subsection 7 of section
110 195.417.
111 5. The offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or
112 purchase of over-the-counter methamphetamine precursor drugs
113 is a class A misdemeanor.
✓